Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 6. Recordation and Effect.

§ 64.2-455.
Wills to be recorded; recording copies; effect; transfer to The Library of Virginia.

Every will or authenticated copy admitted to probate by any circuit court or clerk of any circuit court shall be recorded by the clerk and remain in the clerk’s office, except during such time as the same may be carried to another court under a subpoena duces tecum or as otherwise provided in §

17.1-213

. A certified copy of such will or of any authenticated copy may be recorded in any county or city wherein there is any estate, real or personal, devised or bequeathed by such will.

The personal representative of the testator shall cause a certified copy of any will or of any authenticated copy so admitted to record to be recorded in any county or city wherein there is any real estate of which the testator possessed at the time of his death or that is devised by his will.

Every will or certified copy when recorded shall have the effect of notice to all persons of any devise or disposal by the will of real estate situated in a county or city in which such will or copy is so recorded.

With the approval of the judges of a circuit court of any county or city, the clerk of such court may transfer such original wills from his office to the Archives Division of The Library of Virginia. A copy of any will that has been microfilmed or stored in an electronic medium, prepared from such microfilmed or electronic record and certified as authentic by the clerk or his designee, shall constitute a certified copy of the will for any purpose arising under this title for which a certified copy of the will is required.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-90; 1964, c. 169; 1966, c. 254; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-94; 1978, c. 366; 1994, c. 64; 2001, c. 836; 2002, c. 832; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 6.

§ 64.2-456.
Bona fide purchaser of real estate without notice of devise protected.

The title of a bona fide purchaser without notice from the heir at law of a person who has died heretofore, or who may die hereafter, having title to any real estate of inheritance in the Commonwealth, shall not be affected by a devise of such real estate made by the decedent, unless within one year after the testator’s death the will devising the same or, if such will has been probated outside of the Commonwealth, an authenticated copy thereof and the certificate of probate shall be filed for probate before the court or clerk having jurisdiction for that purpose and shall afterwards be admitted to probate and recorded in the proper court or clerk’s office as a will of real estate.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-91; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-95; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “The Virginia Land Trust — An Overlooked Title Holding Device for Investment, Business and Estate Planning Purposes,” see 30 Wash. &
Lee L. Rev. 73 (1973).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-513. Deed by Executor, et seq.; No. 16-2006. Indemnity and Escrow Agreement for Sale of Real Estate by Heirs of Intestate Decedent.

§ 64.2-457.
Bona fide purchaser of real estate without notice of devise protected; later will.

The title of a bona fide purchaser without notice from the devisee, or from the personal representative with power to sell, encumber, lease, or exchange, under the will of a person who has died heretofore, or may die hereafter, having title to any real estate of inheritance in the Commonwealth, shall not be affected by any other devise of such real estate made by the testator in another will, unless within one year after the testator’s death such other will or, if such other will has been probated outside of the Commonwealth, an authenticated copy thereof and the certificate of probate shall be filed for probate before the court or clerk having jurisdiction for that purpose and shall afterwards be admitted to probate and recorded in the proper court or clerk’s office as a will of real estate.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-92; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-96; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “The Virginia Land Trust — An Overlooked Title Holding Device for Investment, Business and Estate Planning Purposes,” see 30 Wash. &
Lee L. Rev. 73 (1973).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-462 Show Cause Against Distribution, et seq.; No. 16-513 Deed by Executor, et seq.; No. 16-2006 Indemnity and Escrow Agreement for Sale of Real Estate by Heirs of Intestate Decedent, et seq.

§ 64.2-458.
Bona fide purchaser of real estate without notice of devise protected; intestacy.

The title of a bona fide purchaser without notice from the devisee, or from the personal representative with power to sell, encumber, lease, or exchange, under the will of a person who has died heretofore, or may die hereafter, having title to any real estate of inheritance in the Commonwealth, shall not be affected by the later impeachment of the testator’s will that results in intestacy, unless within one year after the testator’s death a complaint is filed before the court having jurisdiction for that purpose.

History.

1991, c. 197, § 64.1-96.1; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey on wills, trusts, and estates, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 925 (1991).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-512 Deed by Heirs, et seq.; No. 16-2006 Indemnity and Escrow Agreement for Sale of Real Estate by Heirs of Intestate Decedent, et seq.